Utah statutes.
58-75-102.   Definitions.
In addition to the definitions in Section 58-1-102, as used in this chapter:
(1)  "Board" means the Genetic Counselors Licensing Board created in Section
58-75-201.
(2)  "Genetic counselor" means a person licensed under this chapter to engage
in the practice of genetic counseling.
(3)  "Practice of genetic counseling" means the communication process which
deals with the human problems associated with the occurrence, or the risk of
occurrence, of a genetic disorder in a family, including the provision of
services to help an individual or family:
(a)  comprehend the medical facts, including the diagnosis, probable cause of
the disorder, and the available management;
(b)  appreciate the way heredity contributes to the disorder and the risk of
occurrence in specified relatives;
(c)  understand the alternatives for dealing with the risk of occurrence;
(d)  choose the course of action which seems appropriate to them in view of
their risk, their family goals, and their ethical and religious standards, and
to act in accordance with that decision; and
(e)  make the best possible psychosocial adjustment to the disorder in an
affected family member or to the risk of occurrence of that disorder.
(4)  "Unlawful conduct" is as defined in Sections 58-1-501 and 58-75-501.
(5)  "Unprofessional conduct" is as defined in Sections 58-1-501 and 58-75-502
and as may be further defined by rule by the division in accordance with Title
63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act.
